src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-6-lingkwe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (20230507: Csilla)

  Verb - лыӈкве: # Verb 'to throw' - full paradigm
    лыӈкве+V+Inf: лыӈкве
#Active, present tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: лыгум
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: лыгын
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: лыг
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: лыгме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [лыгын, лыгы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: лыгыг
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: [лыгув, лыгӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [лыгын, лыгы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: лыгыт

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg: лыглум
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg: лыглын
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg: лыгтэ
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg: лыглуме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg: [лыглын, лыглы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg: лыгтэ̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg: [лыглув, лыглӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg: [лыглын, лыглы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg: лыганыл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu: лыгагум
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu: лыгагын
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu: лыгаге
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu: лыгагме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu: [лыгагын, лыгагы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu: лыгаге̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu: [лыгагув, лыгагӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu: [лыгагын, лыгагы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu: лыгаганыл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl: лыганум
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl: [лыганын, лыган]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl: лыганэ
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl: лыганаме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl: [лыганын, лыганы̄н, лыган]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl: лыганэ̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl: [лыганув, лыганӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl: [лыганын, лыганы̄н, лыган]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl: лыганыл

#Active, past tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: лысум
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: лысын
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: лыс
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: лысме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [лысын, лысы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: [лысыг, лысы̄г]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [лысув, лысӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [лысын, лысы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: лысыт

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg: лыслум
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg: лыслын
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg: лыстэ
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcSg: лыслуме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcSg: [лыслын, лыслы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcSg: лыстэ̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg: [лыслув, лыслӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg: [лыслын, лыслы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg: лысаныл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcDu: лысагум
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcDu: лысагын
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcDu: лысаге
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcDu: лысагме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcDu: [лысагын, лысагы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcDu: лысаге̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcDu: [лысагув, лысагӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcDu: [лысагын, лысагы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcDu: лысаганыл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl: лысанум
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl: [лыса̄нын, лысан]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl: лысанэ
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcPl: [лысанаме̄н, лысанаме̄н, лысанме̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcPl: [лысанын, лысаны̄н, лысан]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcPl: лысанэ̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl: лысанув
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl: [лысанын, лысаны̄н, лысан]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl: лысаныл

#Active, conditional, subjective conjugation
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1: [лынувум, лынӯвум]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2: [лынувын, лынӯвын]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3: лынув
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1: лынуваме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2: [лынувын, лынувы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3: [лынувыг, лынувы̄г]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1: [лынувув, лынувӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2: [лынувын, лынувы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3: [лынувыт, лынувы̄т]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, single object
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg: лынувлум
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg: лынувлын
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg: лынувтэ
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcSg: лынувламе̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcSg: [лынувлын, лынувлы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcSg: лынувтэ̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg: [лынувлув, лынувлӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg: [лынувлын, лынувлы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg: [лынуваныл, лынува̄ныл]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, dual object
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcDu: [лынувагум, лынува̄гум]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcDu: [лынувагын, лынува̄гын]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcDu: [лынуваге, лынува̄ге]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcDu: лынувагме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcDu: [лынувагын, лынувагы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcDu: лынуваге̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcDu: [лынувагув, лынувагӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcDu: [лынувагын, лынувагы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcDu: [лынуваганыл, лынувага̄ныл]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, plural object
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl: [лынуванум, лынува̄нум]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl: [лынуванын, лынува̄нын]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl: [лынуванэ, лынува̄нэ]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcPl: лынуванме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcPl: [лынуванын, лынуваны̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcPl: лынуванэ̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl: лынуванув
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl: [лынуванын, лынуваны̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl: [лынуваныл, лынува̄ныл]

#Active, imperative, subjective conjugation
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2: лаен
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2: [лаен, лае̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2: [лаен, лае̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, single object
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg: [лаелн, лае̄лн]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg: [лае̄лн, лае̄лы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg: [лае̄лн, лае̄лы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, dual object
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu: [лаегын, лае̄гн]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu: [лаегын, лаегы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu: [лаегын, лаегы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, plural object
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl: [лаен, лае̄н, лае̄нын]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl: [лаен, лае̄н, лае̄нын, лае̄ны̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl: [лаен, лае̄н, лае̄нын, лае̄ны̄н]

#Passive, present tense, indicative
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: лывем
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: лывен
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: лыве
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: лывеме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [лывен, лыве̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: лыве̄г
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: лыве̄в
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [лывен, лыве̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: лывет

#Passive, past tense, indicative
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: лайве̄сум
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: лайве̄сын
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [лайвес, лайве̄с]
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: лайвесаме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [лайвесын, лайвесы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: лайвесы̄г
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [лайвесув, лайвесӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [лайвесын, лайвесы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: лайве̄сыт

#Passive, conditional
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg1: [лынувем, лынӯвем]
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg2: [лынувен, лынӯвен]
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg3: [лынуве, лынӯве]
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu1: лынувеме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu2: [лынувен, лынуве̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu3: [лынувег, лынуве̄г]
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl1: лынуве̄в
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl2: [лынувен, лынуве̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl3: [лынувет, лынӯвет]

#Passive, imperative conjugation
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Sg2: лыгвен
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Du2: [лыгвен, лыгве̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Pl2: [лыгвен, лыгве̄н]

#Present participle
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc: лынэ
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1: лынэм
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2: лынэн
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3: лынэ̄тэ
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1: лынэме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2: лынэнэ̄н
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3: [лынэг, лынэ̄г]
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1: лынэ̄в
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2: [лынэн, лынэ̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3: [лынэныл, лынэ̄ныл]

#Present participle, single object
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1+OcSg: лынэ̄лум
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2+OcSg: [лынэ̄лн, лынэ̄лын]
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3+OcSg: лынэ̄тэ
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1+OcSg: лынэламе̄н
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2+OcSg: лынэлы̄н
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3+OcSg: лынэтэ̄н
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1+OcSg: [лынэлув, лынэлӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2+OcSg: лынэлы̄н
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3+OcSg: [лынэ̄нл, лынэ̄ныл]

#Present participle, dual object
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1+OcDu: лынэ̄гум
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2+OcDu: [лынэ̄гн, лынэ̄гын]
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3+OcDu: лынэ̄гэ
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1+OcDu: лынэгаме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2+OcDu: лынэгы̄н
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3+OcDu: лынэгэ̄н
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1+OcDu: [лынэгув, лынэгӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2+OcDu: лынэгагы̄н
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3+OcDu: лынэгаганыл

#Present participle, plural object
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1+OcPl: лынэ̄нум
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2+OcPl: лынэ̄н
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3+OcPl: лынэ̄нэ
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1+OcPl: [лынэнаме̄н, лынэнанме̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2+OcPl: [лынэны̄н, лынэныны̄н, лынэнаны̄н] 
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3+OcPl: [лынэнэ̄н, лынэнанэ̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1+OcPl: [лынэнув, лынэнӯв, лынэнанув, лынэнанӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2+OcPl: [лынэны̄н, лынэнаны̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3+OcPl: [лынэ̄нл, лынэ̄наныл]

#Past participle
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc: лым
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1: лымум
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2: лымын
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3: лыме
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1: лымаме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2: [лымын, лымы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3: лымыг
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1: [лымув, лымӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2: [лымын, лыммы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3: лымыт

#Past participle, single object
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcSg: лымлум
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcSg: лымлын
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcSg: лымтэ
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcSg: лымламе̄н
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcSg: лымлы̄н
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcSg: лымтэ̄н
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcSg: [лымлув, лымлӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcSg: лымлы̄н
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcSg: лыманыл

#Past participle, dual object
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcDu: лымагум
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcDu: лымагын
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcDu: лымаге
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcDu: [лымагаме̄н, лымагагме̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcDu: [лымагы̄н, лымагагы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcDu: [лымагы̄г, лымагагы̄г]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcDu: [лымагув, лымагӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcDu: [лымагы̄н, лымагагы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcDu: [лымагагыл, лымагаганыл]
